North Dakota, session 69, SB2087.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-72-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
4.1-72-05. AnimalPremises identification program - Administration.
The North Dakota stockmen's association shall serve as the state'sa state administrator and
allocator for that portion of any federally sponsored animalpremises identification program which
pertains to cattle, horses, and mules.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subdivision f of subsection 2 of section 36-01-36 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
f. The disclosure is to provide the North Dakota stockmen's association with information
pursuant tounder section 4.1-72-05.

S. B. NO. 2087 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2087.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State